Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Chapter 9. County Courts

§ 9-9-1.
Continuation and establishment in certain counties.

There shall be an inferior court to be known as the county court in and for each of the following counties:

Each county of the state wherein a county court is in existence on July 1, 1985;

From and after January 1, 1987, each county that has a population exceeding fifty thousand (50,000) inhabitants as shown by the latest federal decennial census; and

The board of supervisors of any county having a population exceeding thirty-nine thousand (39,000) inhabitants as shown by the latest federal decennial census in which Highways 589 and 98 intersect shall have the option to establish a county court under the provisions of this section.

A county judge for a county that is required to establish a county court under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be elected by the qualified electors of the county in the same manner as provided for the election of circuit court judges at an election held at the same time as the next regular election of circuit court judges first occurring after the date upon which it can be determined that a county court is required under the provisions of subsection (1)(b) of this section to be established in such county.

A county judge for a county electing to establish a county court under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be elected by the qualified electors of the county in the same manner as provided for the election of circuit court judges at an election held at the November general election first occurring after the date when the board of supervisors spreads upon its minutes a resolution creating the county court. The term of the county court judge so elected shall begin on the first day of January following the November election, and shall end at the same time as for county court judges generally. Thereafter, the county court judge shall be elected and serve for a term as provided for county court judges generally.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed so as to require that a county court be established in any county in which the board of supervisors has agreed and contracted with the board of supervisors of any other county or counties to support and maintain one (1) county court for such counties as provided in Section 9-9-3.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 693; 1942 § 1604; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1934, ch. 236; Laws, 1936, ch. 247; Laws, 1948, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, ch. 321; Laws, 1962, ch. 300; Laws, 1964, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 60; Laws, 2002, ch. 356, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 318, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 442, § 2, eff June 21, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the bringing forward without change of this section).

§ 9-9-3.
Establishment by agreement between two or more counties; expenses of operating court to be prorated.

Any two (2) or more counties in the discretion of their respective boards of supervisors may contract and agree between themselves to support and maintain one (1) county court for such counties. If such agreement be made then the expenses of the operation of said court shall be prorated among such two (2) or more counties and the pro rata part of each county shall be paid from the general funds of each county, from any special tax which may be levied for the support of such court, or any funds made available to the county from the Federal Law Enforcement Assistance Administration for this purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 693; 1942, § 1604; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1934, ch. 236; Laws, 1936, ch. 247; Laws, 1948, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, ch. 321; Laws, 1962, ch. 300; Laws, 1964, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 338, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1974).

§ 9-9-5.
County judge; qualifications, election, term of office, and filling of vacancies.

The county judge shall possess all of the qualifications of a circuit judge as prescribed by the Mississippi Constitution. In the event of the establishment of a county court by agreement between two (2) or more counties as provided in Section 9-9-3, the judge of said court may be a qualified elector of any one (1) of said counties, and shall have such other qualifications as provided for by law. The county judge shall be elected by the qualified electors of his county at the time and in the manner as circuit judges are elected and he shall hold office for the same term. Vacancies in the office of county judge shall be filled in the same manner as vacancies in the office of circuit judge.

Provided, however, that in any county having a total population in excess of eleven thousand (11,000) according to the 1970 federal decennial census and a total assessed valuation of real and personal property of not less than sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000.00) and not more than seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000.00) and in which Mississippi Highway 4 and United States Highway 61 intersect, in which there is a vacancy in the post of county judge resulting from the failure of a candidate to qualify for that post, the board of supervisors of such county may, upon certification of such vacancy to the board, appoint a county judge to serve out the term so vacated who shall be a licensed attorney from such county or an adjoining county. The compensation of such attorney shall be the same he would have otherwise received if elected.

In the event that any county wherein is located a state hospital and wherein U.S. Highway 80 and Mississippi Highway 43 intersect shall establish a county court, the county judge of such county shall be elected at the general election to be held on Tuesday after the first Monday of November, 1982, after qualifying therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that the board of supervisors of such county may appoint a county judge who shall be a licensed attorney from such county until the office of county judge shall be filled pursuant to said election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 693, 697; 1942, §§ 1604, 1608; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1934, ch. 236; Laws, 1936, chs. 247, 254; Laws, 1946, ch. 370; Laws, 1948, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, chs. 251, 321; Laws, 1952, ch. 238; Laws, 1954, ch. 230; Laws, 1954 Ex Sess ch. 15; Laws, 1955 Ex. ch. 39, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 234; Laws, 1962, ch. 300; Laws, 1964, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, chs. 344, § 1, 345, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, chs. 335, § 1, 402, § 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 399; Laws, 1982, ch. 476, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 22, 1982).

§ 9-9-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 102, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the repeal of this section).

§9-9-7. [Codes, 1930, § 708; 1942, § 1623; Laws, 1926, ch. 131]

§ 9-9-9.
County judge; general restriction on practice of law.

The county judge shall not practice law in any of the courts of the county wherein he holds court, but this prohibition shall not prohibit the judges of the county courts from practicing in any of the courts so far as to enable them to bring to a conclusion cases actually pending when they were appointed or elected, in which such county judges were then employed as provided in Section 9-1-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, for judges of the circuit court and chancellors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 697; 1942, § 1608; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1936, ch. 254; Laws, 1946, ch. 370; Laws, 1950, ch. 251; Laws, 1952, ch. 238; Laws, 1954, ch. 230; Laws, 1954 Ex Sess ch. 15; Laws, 1955 Ex. ch. 39, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 234; Laws, 1966, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 9-9-11.
County judge; compensation and further restrictions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2), (3) and (4), the county court judge shall receive an annual salary payable monthly out of the county treasury in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county; provided, however, that the salary of such judge shall not be reduced during his term of office. Provided further, that the office of county court judge in any county receiving an annual salary of Thirty-six Thousand Dollars ($36,000.00) or more shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

If a county court is established by agreement between two (2) or more counties as provided in Section 9-9-3, the county judge of the court so established shall be paid a salary equal to one and one-half (1-1/2) times that salary that he would be paid if he were the judge of the smallest of such two (2) or more counties, such salary to be paid in monthly installments as provided by law; provided that such salary shall not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary of the circuit and chancery judges of this state.

The county court judge shall receive an annual salary payable monthly out of the county treasury as follows:

In any county having a population of seventy thousand (70,000) or more according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than that paid to a circuit court judge. The office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

In any county having a population of sixty thousand (60,000) or more but less than seventy thousand (70,000) according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00). The office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. The county judge shall not be eligible for any additional salary except as may be authorized in subsection (4).

In any county having a population of twenty-seven thousand (27,000) or more but less than sixty thousand (60,000) according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of not less than Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) but not more than Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), in the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county. The county judge shall not be eligible for any additional salary except as may be authorized in subsection (4). In the event that the board of supervisors of said county elects to pay such county judge an annual salary of Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) or more, the office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

In any county having a population of less than twenty-seven thousand (27,000) according to the 1980 federal census, the county judge shall receive an annual salary of not less than Four Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($4,200.00) and not more than Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00), in the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county. The county judge shall not be eligible for any additional salary except as may be authorized in subsection (4).

The county judge of any county described in this subsection shall be paid the compensation, and he shall be subject to any restrictions set forth in the following paragraphs:

The county judge of any such Class 1 county with a population according to the latest federal decennial census of forty-five thousand (45,000) or more and lying wholly within a levee district and having two (2) judicial districts shall, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, receive an annual salary not exceeding Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00), or a sum which is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of the state, whichever is greater.

The county judge of any Class 1 county having an area in excess of nine hundred twenty-five (925) square miles shall receive an annual salary of not less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) but, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, such salary may be not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) less than the annual salary of a circuit judge, payable monthly out of the county treasury, and the county judge shall not practice law.

The office of county judge in any such Class 1 county with a population according to the 1970 federal decennial census of greater than thirty-nine thousand (39,000), and where U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 6 intersect, shall receive an annual salary to be paid in monthly installments of not less than an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the annual salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of the state, as follows: The salary of the county judge shall be increased by ten percent (10%) annually above the base salary of the preceding year until such time as the judge’s salary is equal to the amount that is provided by this subsection. The office of county judge shall be a full-time position and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

In any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River and which has situated therein a national military park and national military cemetery, the office of county judge shall be a full-time position and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. The salary for the county judge in said county shall be fixed at a sum which is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state.

The county judge in any county having a population of at least forty-two thousand one hundred eleven (42,111), according to the 1970 census, and where U.S. Highway 49E and U.S. Highway 82 intersect, shall receive an annual salary to be paid in monthly installments of not less than Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) but not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) less than the annual salary of the circuit judge, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county.

The county judge in any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River and having an area of less than four hundred fifty (450) square miles wherein U.S. Highways 84 and 61 intersect shall receive an annual salary of Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) less than the annual salary of a circuit judge, and such county judge shall not practice law in any manner. The county judge in such county shall not be eligible to receive any additional salary authorized by this section or from any other source other than that set out and authorized by this paragraph.

The county judge of any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River on the west and the State of Tennessee on the north, and traversed north to south by Interstate Highway 55, shall receive an annual salary of ninety percent (90%) of the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for chancery and circuit judges of this state, but in any event not less than Sixty Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($60,200.00).

The county judge of any Class 1 county with a population of greater than sixty-nine thousand (69,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, and wherein U.S. Highway 80 and Mississippi Highway 43 intersect, shall receive an annual salary in an amount not greater than the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county.

The county judge of any county having a population in excess of sixty-six thousand (66,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, wherein is located a state-supported university and in which U.S. Highways 49 and 11 intersect, shall receive an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than that paid to a circuit court judge. The office of such county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

The county judge of any county having two (2) judicial districts, having a population in excess of sixty-one thousand nine hundred (61,900) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, in which U.S. Interstate Highway 59 intersects with U.S. Highway 84, shall receive an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary which is now or hereafter authorized to be paid circuit and chancery court judges of this state. The office of such county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

The office of county judge of any Class I county wherein U.S. Highway 51 and U.S. Highway 98 intersect shall be a full-time position and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law. The annual salary for the office of county judge in said county may be fixed, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of said county, at a sum not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) less than the salary which is now or shall hereafter be provided for circuit and chancery judges of this state.

The county judge of any county having a population of more than forty-one thousand six hundred (41,600) but less than forty-one thousand six hundred fifty (41,650) according to the 1980 federal census, and wherein U.S. Highway 49 intersects with Mississippi Highway 22, shall receive an annual salary payable monthly out of the county treasury of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than the salary provided now or hereafter for circuit and chancery judges of this state.

The county judge of any county having a population of more than fifty-seven thousand (57,000) but less than fifty-seven thousand one hundred (57,100) according to the 1980 federal census, wherein U.S. Highway 45 intersects with Mississippi Highway 6, shall receive an annual salary in an amount established by the board of supervisors, but in no event to exceed the salary provided now or hereafter for circuit and chancery judges of this state.

The county judge of any county having a population of more than fifty-seven thousand three hundred (57,300) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, wherein is located a state-supported university and wherein U.S. Highways 82 and 45 intersect, shall receive an annual salary in an amount established by the board of supervisors, but in no event to exceed the salary provided now or hereafter for circuit and chancery judges of this state.

The salary of a county court judge or justice court judge shall not be reduced during his term of office as a result of a population decrease based upon the 1990 federal decennial census.

The salary of a sheriff shall not be reduced during his term of office as a result of a population decrease based upon the 1990 federal decennial census.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may pay its county court judge an annual salary of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) less than that paid to a circuit court judge. The office of county judge shall be a full-time position, and the holder thereof shall not otherwise engage in the practice of law.

There shall be transferred to the county for each county court judge, payment to be made in monthly installments from the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45, an annual salary supplement of:

From and after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013, the sum of Seven Thousand Nine Hundred Fifty-seven Dollars and Fifty Cents ($7,957.50), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount;

From and after January 1, 2014, through December 31, 2014, the sum of Fifteen Thousand Nine Hundred Fifteen Dollars ($15,915.00), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount;

From and after January 1, 2015, through December 31, 2015, the sum of Twenty-three Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($23,872.50), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount; and

From and after January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2019, the sum of Thirty-one Thousand Eight Hundred Thirty Dollars ($31,830.00), plus any applicable fringe benefits resulting from this amount.

From and after January 1, 2019, and every four (4) years thereafter, the annual salary in this subsection (8) shall be adjusted according to the level of compensation recommended by the State Personnel Board for county court judges in the board’s most recent report on judicial salaries, as required under Section 25-9-115, to the extent that sufficient funds are available.

The total annual salary paid to the county court judge out of the county treasury and out of the Judicial System Operation Fund created under Section 9-21-45 shall not exceed the salary limitation set forth in subsection (7) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 693, 697; 1942, §§ 1604, 1608; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1934, ch. 236; Laws, 1936, chs. 247, 254; Laws, 1946, ch. 370; Laws, 1948, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, chs. 251, 321; Laws, 1952, ch. 238; Laws, 1954, ch. 230; Laws, 1954 Ex Sess ch. 15; Laws, 1955 Ex. ch. 39, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 234; Laws, 1962, ch. 300; Laws, 1964, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, chs. 344, § 1, 345, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, chs. 335, § 1, 402, § 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 461; Laws, 1978, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 457, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 558; Laws, 1982, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 526; Laws, 1986, ch. 463; Laws, 1988, ch. 508; Laws, 1989, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 559 § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 8, eff January 1, 2013 (the later of the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, or January 1, 2013).

§ 9-9-13.
Municipalities may supplement salaries of county judicial officers surrendering right to practice law.

The governing body of any municipality with a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000) persons, upon determination that municipal security or efficiency is involved in the judicial process in the handling of appeals from municipal court and of related matters, may contract to supplement the salary of county judicial officers in the county in which such municipality is located in exchange for the surrender by such judicial officers of the right to engage in the practice of law. The salary of such judicial officer so supplemented shall not exceed the salary of circuit or chancery judges in such county or of municipal councilmen, whichever is less.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1608.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 503, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 9-9-14.
Additional judge for Harrison County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court of Harrison County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket, there shall be three (3) county judges for Harrison County provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as “place one,” “place two” and “place three.” There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the three (3) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Harrison County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county shall have the power to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Harrison County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity and criminal divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The Governor shall appoint some qualified person from Harrison County to fill the office of county judge hereby created, who shall hold office until his successor is elected and qualified in the manner and form as provided in Section 9-9-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, and said appointment and election shall in all respects be of the same import as if the office had heretofore been in existence and a vacancy had as of October 1, 1972, occurred therein.

Each county judge shall appoint his own court reporter in accordance with Section 9-13-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of doing the necessary stenographic work of the court.

The family court judge in Harrison County shall be the county judge for “place three” from and after March 19, 1999, to serve for the term expiring December 31, 2002.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1604.9; Laws, 1972, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 432, § 3, eff from and after May 28, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-9-15.
Additional judges for Hinds County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of the first judicial district of Hinds County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket and in the youth court, there shall be three (3) county judges for Hinds County, Mississippi, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For purposes of appointment, nomination and election, the three (3) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as Place One, Place Two and Place Three. There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the three (3) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Hinds County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county, shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the constitution and laws of this state, the county court in Hinds County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1604.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 231, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1971, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1971).

§ 9-9-16.
Additional judge for Washington County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court of Washington County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket, it is enacted that from and after January 1, 1976, in the manner provided herein, there shall be two (2) county judges for Washington County, Mississippi, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as “place one” and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as “place two.” There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Washington County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county shall have the power to assign causes, terms and dockets. Should neither judge of said county court have served longer in said office than the other, then that judge of this county court who has been for the longest time a member of the Mississippi State Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Washington County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity, youth and criminal divisions as a matter of convenience, by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

Each county judge shall appoint his own court reporter in accordance with Section 9-13-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of doing the necessary stenographic work of the court.

The additional judgeship created by this section shall remain vacant unless prior to May 10, 1975, the board of supervisors of Washington County, Mississippi, shall adopt an order duly entered upon the minutes of said board stating that sufficient county funds are available for the compensation and related expenses of the additional judgeship created herein.

If the order of the board of supervisors as required under subsection (5) of this section shall have been duly adopted and entered upon the minutes of said board prior to May 10, 1975, then the additional judgeship herein created shall be filled by a person elected in the regular primary and general elections to be held in 1975, and the person so elected shall hold office from January 1, 1976, for the remainder of the regular term for county judges. All candidates for such office shall possess all of the qualifications of a circuit judge as prescribed by the state constitution and shall qualify for election in the same manner and be governed by the same statutes as other candidates for county office. After the first election to fill the judgeship created herein, the provisions of Section 9-9-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply to the judgeship created herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 464, § eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1975).

§ 9-9-17.
Additional judge for Jackson County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Jackson County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on said docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Jackson County, Mississippi, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as Place One and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as Place Two. There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Jackson County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of said county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Jackson County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The two (2) county judges shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner now prescribed by law for the existing judgeship of Jackson County.

The Board of Supervisors of Jackson County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.

The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1604.7; Laws, 1970, ch. 337, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1975, ch. 491; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 9-9-18.
Additional county court judge for Rankin County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Rankin County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Rankin County, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as “Place One” and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as “Place Two.” There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Rankin County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of this county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Rankin County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or “Place Two,” shall be elected in the regular election of November 2002; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election. The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2003 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time. The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally.

The Board of Supervisors of Rankin County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes. The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 495, § 1, eff July 22, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 9-9-18.1.
Additional county court judge for Madison County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Madison County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Madison County, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as Place One and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as Place Two. There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Madison County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of this county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Madison County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or “Place Two,” shall be elected in the regular election of November 2002; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election. The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2003 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time. The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally.

The Board of Supervisors of Madison County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes. The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 495, § 2, eff July 22, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).